Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 4 Capitol Hill Day-care Center

45-18-70.
Establishment and operation.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the commissioner of administrative services in conjunction with the Georgia Building Authority is authorized by contract or otherwise to establish, equip, and operate a child care learning center as a capitol hill pilot program for the purpose of serving children who are members of households of employees of state government in and around the state capitol. The commissioner of administrative services in conjunction with the Georgia Building Authority is authorized to establish or provide for the establishment of appropriate fees and charges to be chargeable against the state employees who are beneficiaries of services provided by such facility to pay for the cost of their operation and to accept money, equipment, or other property donated for use in connection with the facility.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1489, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-79/HB 642; Ga. L. 2013, p. 135, § 12/HB 354.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

45-18-71.
Rules and regulations for personnel administration.

The State Personnel Board shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be required for the effective administration of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1489, § 1.

45-18-72.
Start-up costs.

The commissioner of administrative services shall present recommendations no later than December 1, 1986, for funding any start-up costs of the pilot project.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-18-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1489, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-80/HB 642.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”